Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 248.355 is amended to read:
248.355. (1) In a year when a President and Vice President of the United States  are to be nom-
inated and elected, each political  party nominating candidates for those offices shall select a number
of candidates for elector of President and Vice President equal to the  total number of Senators and
Representatives to which this state is entitled in Congress.
(2) An individual may be selected  as a candidate for elector of President and Vice Presi-
dent only if, at the time of the individual’s selection, that individual is:
(a) Registered as an elector in this state;
(b) If selected under subsection (1) of this section, registered as being affiliated with  the
party selecting that individual; or
(c) If the candidates for President and Vice President are not affiliated with a political
party, registered as not being affiliated with any political party.
[(2)] (3) Upon being selected,  a candidate for elector [ when selected ] shall sign a pledge stating
that, if elected  under ORS 248.360 , the candidate will vote in the electoral  college for the candi-
dates [ of the party ] for President and Vice President of the political party, if  any, that nominated
or appointed the candidate for elector,  except as provided under ORS 248.370 (6)(b) . The Sec-
retary of State shall prescribe the form of the pledge.
(4) The party shall certify the names of the selected candidates for  elector to the Secretary of
State, and provide to the secretary the pledges signed by  the candidates under subsection (3)
of this section,  not later than the 70th day before the election of electors.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 248.370 is amended to read:
248.370. (1) The electors of President  and Vice President shall convene at the State Capitol on
the first Tuesday after the second Wednesday in December following  their election at a time to be
established by the Secretary of State by rule.
(2) The Secretary of State  shall preside over the convening of electors under this section
and shall perform any duty as an administrator on behalf of the electors  in accordance with
the requirements placed on electors under federal law and the laws of this state.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1509 (SB 1509-A) Page 1
[(2)] (3) Not later than six days prior to the convening of electors under subsection  (1) of this
section, the Governor and the Secretary of State shall issue a certificate of  ascertainment of ap-
pointment of electors as required by 3 U.S.C. 5. The certificate of ascertainment shall contain :
(a) A statement that:
(A) The electors listed on  the certificate shall serve as electors unless a vacancy occurs
in the office of elector prior to the end of the meeting convened under this section;
(B) For any  vacancy that may occur prior to the end of the meeting convened under this
section, the vacancy will be filled at the meeting; and
(C) If a vacancy is filled on the day of the meeting of electors, the Governor shall submit
an amended certificate of ascertainment certifying the names  of the final list of electors who
presented valid ballots to the Secretary of State at the meeting; and
(b) A security feature or features for the purpose of verifying the authenticity  of the certificate.
The Secretary of State shall determine by rule the form of the security feature or features under this
subsection.
[(3)] (4)(a) If there is any vacancy in the office of an elector caused by death, refusal  to act,
[neglect] failure to attend the meeting of electors  or otherwise,  the Secretary  of State shall
declare the  vacancy, and  the remaining electors present shall fill the vacancy by plurality of
voice votes at the time and place of the convening of electors under subsection (1) of  this section.
The Governor and the Secretary of State shall  immediately  issue  an amended certificate of
ascertainment in accordance with the requirements of subsection (3) of this section  containing
the name of any elector who fills a vacancy under this subsection  and  indicating that the
amended certificate is to be substituted for  the certificate that was previously issued under
subsection (3) of this section .
[(4)] (b) Prior to the voice vote to fill a vacancy under  paragraph (a) of this  subsection [ (3)
of this section ], a candidate for filling the vacancy shall sign the pledge required under ORS 248.355.
(5) When all  the electors have appeared and any vacancies have been filled  under subsection
(4) of this section , the electors shall take and subscribe to  an oath of office administered by the
Secretary of State.  Following the taking of the oath of office under this subsection, the electors shall
perform the duties required of them by the Constitution and laws of the United States.
(6)(a) Each elector shall  complete two ballots, one for President and one for Vice Presi-
dent. The elector shall cast a vote for the candidates for President and Vice President of the
political party, if any, that nominated or  appointed the elector, except as provided under
paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(b) If the candidate for President or  Vice President dies or withdraws after the date of
the election but before the  meeting of electors, each elector shall vote for the replacement
candidate for President or Vice President who  has been selected in accordance with the rules
and bylaws of the political party, if any.
(7) Each elector  shall present that elector’s completed ballots for President and Vice
President under subsection (6) of this section to the Secretary of State.
(8)(a) The Secretary of State shall examine  each ballot presented under subsection (7)
of this  section to determine whether the ballot is completed in accordance with the pledge
signed by the elector under ORS 248.355. Any ballot that is unmarked or is  not completed in
accordance with the pledge is invalid and may not be counted.
(b) The secretary shall declare that an elector who presents an invalid ballot has vacated
the office of elector and that the office is vacant.
(c) Following the examination under paragraph (a) of this subsection, if a declaration is
made under paragraph (b) of this subsection, the vacancy shall be filled  in accordance with
subsection (4) of  this section. Prior to the voice vote to fill a vacancy under this paragraph,
a candidate for filling the vacancy shall sign the  pledge required under ORS 248.355. The
Governor and the Secretary of State  shall immediately issue an amended certificate of
ascertainment in accordance with the requirements of  subsection (3) of this section con-
taining the name of any elector  who fills a vacancy under this paragraph and indicating that
Enrolled Senate Bill 1509 (SB 1509-A) Page 2
the amended certificate is to be substituted for the  certificate that was previously issued
under subsection (3) of this section.
(d) The elector who fills a vacancy under this subsection shall take and subscribe to an
oath of office administered by the Secretary of State and shall vote in  accordance with sub-
section (6) of this section.
(9) After each elector has completed  and presented ballots for President and Vice Presi-
dent, and the Secretary of State has  determined that each ballot is valid, the secretary shall
prepare certificates of vote  in accordance with the requirements of 3 U.S.C. 9. The certif-
icates of vote must be signed and transmitted in accordance with 3 U.S.C. 9, 10 and 11.
(10) The Secretary of State may adopt rules for the administration of this section.
[(6) The Secretary of State shall preside over the convening of electors under this section and shall
perform any duty as an administrator on behalf of  the electors in accordance with the requirements
placed on electors under federal law and the laws of this state. ]
SECTION 3.  ORS 248.380 is amended to read:
248.380. An elector of President and Vice  President of the United States who attends at the time
and place appointed and votes for President and Vice President , and whose ballot is  not deter-
mined by the Secretary of State to be invalid under ORS 248.370,  shall be  entitled to receive
from this state mileage expenses at the rate allowed to members of the Legislative Assembly.
SECTION 4. This 2026 Act takes effect on July 1, 2026.
Passed by Senate February 19, 2026
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House March 4, 2026
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1509 (SB 1509-A) Page 3